Arkansas, session 2025, SB496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-35-210(a)(2)(A)(iii), concerning the
farm vehicles and machinery for which it is not necessary to obtain a permit
for special cargo issued by the State Highway Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(iii) The vehicle or machinery is either:
(a) Being transported by a farm machinery
equipment dealer hauler or repair person in making a delivery of a new or
used vehicle or new or used machinery to the farm of the purchaser; or
(b) Being used in making a pickup and delivery
of the vehicle or machinery from the farm to a shop of a farm machinery
equipment dealer hauler or repair person for repairs and return to the farm;
and
*ZRC092*
03/17/2025 4:45:05 PM ZRC092

SB496

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-35-210(p)(1)—(3), concerning the
issuance of a permit for special cargo issued by the State Highway Commission
to transport farm machinery equipment, is amended to read as follows:
(p)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section,
the commission may issue a special permit valid for one (1) year authorizing
the movement of a vehicle hauling farm machinery equipment that exceeds the
maximum width authorized under § 27-35-206, but does not exceed twelve feet
(12′), if a farm machinery equipment dealer hauler:
(A) Applies to the commission for the special permit; and
(B) Pays a fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500)
per vehicle authorized under this subdivision (p)(1).
(2) A farm machinery equipment dealer hauler is responsible for
the safe routing of a vehicle issued a permit under subdivision (p)(1) of
this section, including without limitation ensuring the highways traveled by
the vehicle are sufficiently wide for the safety of the vehicle and the
traveling public.
(3) The commission may require that a farm machinery equipment
dealer hauler provide a bond or other security to compensate the Arkansas
Department of Transportation in the event of:
(A) Damage to a highway or a highway structure caused by a
vehicle issued a permit under subdivision (p)(1) of this section; or
(B) Costs related to the extrication of a vehicle issued a
permit under subdivision (p)(1) of this section from a width-restricted
highway or a highway construction or maintenance zone.











03/17/2025 4:45:05 PM ZRC092